data/hungarian.aff
SFX Ť   ik   ott          gyik                      [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   ik   ott          gyik                      [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX Ť   ik   ott          [bdgjklmrtzy][ldgrz]ik    [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   ik   ott          [bdgjklmrtzy][ldgrz]ik    [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX Ť   ik   ott          [bdfgkmpstvz]ik           [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   ik   ott          [bdfgkmpstvz]ik           [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX Ť   ik   ott          [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű][^bgkmpstvzyd]ik [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   ik   ott          [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű][^bgkmpstvzyd]ik [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX Ť   0    tságú        ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[jÚ_PROPERTY_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖUiFQx!
SFX Ť   0    tságú        [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[jÚ_PROPERTY_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖUiFQx!
SFX Ť   0    tságos       ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicFSsx!
SFX Ť   0    tságos       [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicFSsx!
SFX Ť   0    tságnyi      ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[nyi_MEASURE_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    tságnyi      [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[nyi_MEASURE_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    tsági        ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    tsági        [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    tság         ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsY
SFX Ť   0    tság         [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsY
SFX Ť   0    tabbik       ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bbik_DESIGNATE_adj] mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    tabbik       [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bbik_DESIGNATE_adj] mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    tabban       ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[An_MODE_adv]
SFX Ť   0    tabban       [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[An_MODE_adv]
SFX Ť   0    tabb         ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    tabb         [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    t            ny                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   0    t            ny                        [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX Ť   0    t            [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   0    t            [^bgkmpstvzyd]            [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX Ť   0    ottságú      gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[jÚ_PROPERTY_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖUiFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottságú      [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[jÚ_PROPERTY_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖUiFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottságú      [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[jÚ_PROPERTY_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖUiFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottságos     gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicFSsx!
SFX Ť   0    ottságos     [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicFSsx!
SFX Ť   0    ottságos     [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicFSsx!
SFX Ť   0    ottságnyi    gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[nyi_MEASURE_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottságnyi    [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[nyi_MEASURE_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottságnyi    [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[nyi_MEASURE_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottsági      gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottsági      [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottsági      [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQx!
SFX Ť   0    ottság       gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsY
SFX Ť   0    ottság       [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsY
SFX Ť   0    ottság       [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsY
SFX Ť   0    ottabbik     gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bbik_DESIGNATE_adj] mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    ottabbik     [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bbik_DESIGNATE_adj] mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    ottabbik     [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bbik_DESIGNATE_adj] mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    ottabban     gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[An_MODE_adv]
SFX Ť   0    ottabban     [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[An_MODE_adv]
SFX Ť   0    ottabban     [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[An_MODE_adv]
SFX Ť   0    ottabb       gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    ottabb       [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    ottabb       [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇUiFQDr
SFX Ť   0    ott          gy                        [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   0    ott          gy                        [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX Ť   0    ott          [nl]l                     [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   0    ott          [nl]l                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX Ť   0    ott          [bdfgmpstvz]              [tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQs
SFX Ť   0    ott          [bdfgmpstvz]              [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
