data/hungarian.dic
óv/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
átkoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
áramol/Š§ĽŁĄOŤdX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
állatiasodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ábrázol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
zuhintat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	zuhint[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
zsiványkodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
zavarodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vállasodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vizitál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
villantat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	villant[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
valutázik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
urizál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tébolyul/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
táboroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
transzponál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
toldoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
terrorizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tanúzik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
súgat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	súg[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szólózik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szállasztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szopogat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szilánkol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szamárkodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szabadalmaz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
stafíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
skálázik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
sarkantyúz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ráncosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
roppant/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ringatózik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
rekriminál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ragaszt/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pályáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
prédál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
portóz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pletyózik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
perszonifikál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
parancsol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
oszt/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
oldat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nyávog/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nyirkál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
navigál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
máriásozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
mosat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
melíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
marat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
madarászik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lukad/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
likvidál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lassabbodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
körülír/ŠĽŁOoŤ	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kántál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kulminál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kotonoz/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
korbácsolódik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
konfrontál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
koegzisztál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kilukaszt/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
karóz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kanyarodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kacag/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
izzat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	izz[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
involvál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
improvizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hólabdázik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hágat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
horpaszt/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hibádzik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hasadozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hallózik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hagyat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
gyurkál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
grasszál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
gardíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
fájdogál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
fosztat/ŠĽŁOoŤX	foszt[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
folytat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
flótázik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
felfókáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
faggatózik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
elsuszterol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ebugattázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
dugdosgat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
dobban/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
deszkáz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
datál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
csór/ŠĽŁOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
csoportozódik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
csibukozik/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
civódik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
bújik/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
bábáskodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
boázik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
bolyong/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
bizalmatlankodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
behintőporoz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
avul/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
anyáskodik/ŠŁOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
aljasít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
agonizál/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
